Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MICC; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Minnesota Independence College and Community (MICC) to provide employment preparation, job placement, job retention, and service coordination services to adults with autism and learning differences. new text end